Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2679YC (3) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 27A.12 Failure to comply. 1 1. Any law enforcement officer, including an elected 2 sheriff, who knowingly and intentionally fails to comply with 3 the requirements of this chapter shall, upon conviction, be 4 guilty of a class âDâ felony. 5 2. A conviction under subsection 1 shall be grounds 6 for mandatory revocation of a law enforcement officerâs 7 certification by the Iowa law enforcement academy pursuant to 8 section 80B.13A, subsection 2, paragraph âaâ . 9